Utah statutes.
34A-8a-105.   Duties of Utah State Office of Rehabilitation not affected.

This chapter does not affect the duties and responsibilities of the Utah State Office of Rehabilitation.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 158, 2009 General Session

